Florida, session 2026, HB153.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section
39.201, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (f) is added
to subsection (3) of that section, to read:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb153-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 153 2026
39.201 Required reports of child abuse, abandonment, or
neglect, sexual abuse of a child, and juvenile sexual abuse;
required reports of death; reports involving a child who has
exhibited inappropriate sexual behavior.—
(1) MANDATORY REPORTING.—
(a)1. A person is required to report immediately to the
central abuse hotline established in s. 39.101, in writing,
through a call to the toll-free telephone number, or through
electronic reporting, if he or she knows, or has reasonable
cause to suspect, that any of the following has occurred:
a. Child abuse, abandonment, or neglect by a parent or
caregiver, which includes, but is not limited to, when a child
is abused, abandoned, or neglected by a parent, legal custodian,
caregiver, or other person responsible for the child's welfare
or when a child is in need of supervision and care and has no
parent, legal custodian, or responsible adult relative
immediately known and available to provide such supervision and
care.
b. Child abuse by an adult other than a parent, legal
custodian, caregiver, or other person responsible for the
child's welfare. The central abuse hotline must immediately
electronically transfer such reports to the appropriate county
sheriff's office or local law enforcement agency.
2. Any person who knows, or has reasonable cause to
suspect, that a child is the victim of sexual abuse or juvenile
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb153-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 153 2026
sexual abuse shall report such knowledge or suspicion to the
central abuse hotline, including if the alleged incident
involves a child who is in the custody of or under the
protective supervision of the department.
3. Any person who knows, or has reasonable cause to
suspect, that a child has been born to a parent who has another
child who is in the custody of or under the protective
supervision of the department shall report such knowledge or
suspicion to the central abuse hotline.

Such reports may be made in writing, through the statewide toll-
free telephone number, or through electronic reporting.
(3) ADDITIONAL CIRCUMSTANCES RELATED TO REPORTS.—
(f) Children born to certain parents.—
1. The central abuse hotline must accept reports alleging
that a child has been born to a parent who has another child who
is in the custody of or under the protective supervision of the
department. Such reports require an immediate onsite protective
investigation and the central abuse hotline shall immediately
notify the department's designated district staff responsible
for protective investigations to ensure that an onsite
protective investigation is promptly initiated.
2. There is a rebuttable presumption that a child born to
a parent who has another child in the custody of or under the
protective supervision of the department is in immediate danger
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb153-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 153 2026
of abuse, abandonment, or neglect. A parent may rebut such
presumption by providing to the department evidence that the
parent is successfully participating in department or court-
ordered services or other evidence as required by the
department.
3. If the department determines that the rebuttable
presumption has been rebutted and there is not an immediate
threat to the child's well-being or safety, the department must
maintain a record that includes any previous allegations,
complaints, or petitions against the parent and the evidence
that the department relied upon in determining that the parent
rebutted the presumption.
4. If the presumption is not rebutted and a child is taken
into the custody of the department after a protective
investigation is conducted under s. 39.301, the department may
not return the child to the parent's custody until all of the
following have occurred:
a. A guardian ad litem is appointed for the child.
b. The department has conducted a full protective
investigation pursuant to this chapter and the results of the
protective investigation, including any previous allegations,
complaints, or petitions of abuse, abandonment, or neglect
against the parent, have been presented to the court at the
shelter hearing.
100 c. The court determines by a preponderance of the evidence
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb153-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 153 2026
101 that the child will be provided a safe home and there is not an
102 immediate threat to the child's well-being or safety.
103 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb153-00